Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 7. Fees.

§ 17.1-266.
Services rendered in Commonwealth’s cases.

No clerk, sheriff or other officer shall receive payment out of the state treasury for any services rendered in cases of the Commonwealth, whether in a court of record or a court not of record, except as allowed by statute. Localities shall be exempt from paying fees for services rendered by a clerk or other court officer for cases, whether in a court of record or a court not of record, when the locality is a party to a case commenced in a court serving that locality or in any other jurisdiction when the localities have a reciprocal waiver of fees agreement. Sheriffs may, in writing, grant a waiver of the sheriff’s fee to one or more localities.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-98; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-87; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1998, c. 872; 2007, c. 800.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 800 added the last two sentences.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 100.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A clerk of court may install recording systems

into a Circuit Court, General District Court, and/or Juvenile and Domestic Relations Court and require such systems to be on at all times court is in session and, further, that the Clerk may charge a fee for access to such recordings provided that confidentiality is maintained for all proceedings as required by the Virginia Code or Court orders. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, 10-063, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (8/2/10).

§ 17.1-267.
Services for which clerks may not charge.

No clerk shall charge for taking bond from, administering oath to, or making or copying orders as to the appointment or qualification of any judge, magistrate, sheriff, treasurer, commissioner of the revenue, or of a deputy of any of them, or of any escheator, supervisor, or of a guardian or conservator, when his bond is in a penalty not exceeding $1,000.00, or for making or copying orders as to county allowances, or grand juries, and administering the necessary oaths.

No clerk shall charge for copying or making for or furnishing to the Department of Corrections or a federal probation officer a certified copy of a criminal judgment order or criminal sentencing order.

No clerk shall charge a fee for (i) executing any order of publication under §

17.1-626

; (ii) keeping, preserving, and holding available for public inspection judgment records, and making entries in and indexing such judgments, or discharging, or marking satisfied, a lien under §§

15.2-2604

,

15.2-2605

and

15.2-2120

; (iii) docketing judgment on forfeited recognizance or bond under §

19.2-147

; (iv) making out reports to the Central Criminal Records Exchange under §

19.2-390

; (v) recording a lien in the miscellaneous lien book under §

43-42

or §

43-43

; or (vi) filing an appraiser’s report under § 56-436.

No clerk shall charge a fee for (i) recording the reports of special receivers and commissioners as required by §

8.01-617

; (ii) copying in the Induction and Discharge Record information obtained from draft boards or recording the discharge papers, or certified copy of such, of a person who has served in the armed forces of the United States; or (iii) receiving any mark of designation under § 59.1-103.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-101; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-90; 1972, c. 549; 1991, c. 46; 1992, c. 498; 1994, c. 432; 1997, c. 801; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-268.
Fee for effort to serve when person cannot be found.

Whenever a sheriff is required to serve a declaration in ejectment or an order, notice, summons or other process in a pending civil case and make return thereon and shall after due effort and without fault be unable to locate such person or make service of such process in some method provided by law, the sheriff shall be paid the same fee provided by law for serving an order, notice or other process and making return thereof, to be taxed as other costs. When service is required in a proceeding not pending in a court then the service shall be paid for by the party at whose instance it is had. No fee shall be paid unless the sheriff returns such paper unexecuted and makes and files therewith an affidavit setting forth the fact that he has made diligent effort to execute such paper and without avail.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-107; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-96; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-269.
To whom fees charged.

Unless otherwise provided, the fees mentioned in this article shall be chargeable to the party at whose instance the service is performed, except that fees for entering and certifying the attendance of witnesses and the proceedings to compel payment for such attendance shall be charged to the party for whom the witness attended.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-108; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-97; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-270.
Officer to state fees, etc., on affidavit, deposition or report.

A notary or other officer returning affidavits or depositions of witnesses and a commissioner returning a report shall state at the foot thereof the fees therefor, to whom charged and, if paid, by whom.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-109; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-98; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-271.
Deposit of money in bank.

Whenever any clerk of a court receives or collects any money for or on account of the Commonwealth or any county, city, town or person, he shall, within a reasonable time, deposit the same in such bank or banks selected by him to the credit of an official account, and in the event of the failure or insolvency of such bank, the clerk shall not be responsible for any loss of funds resulting from such failure or insolvency.

Any such officer who deposits any such money in his personal account, knowingly intermingles any of the same with his personal funds, or otherwise violates any of the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. However, prosecution hereunder shall not preclude criminal prosecution under any other section of this Code.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-112; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-101; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1981, c. 152; 1993, c. 334; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Officers, § 49.

§ 17.1-272.
Process and service fees generally.

The fee for process and service in the following instances shall be $12:

Service on any person, firm or corporation, an order, notice, summons or any other civil process, except as herein otherwise provided, and for service on any person, firm, or corporation any process when the body is not taken and making a return thereof, except that no fee shall be charged for service pursuant to §

2.2-4022

.

Summoning a witness or garnishee on an attachment.

Service on any person of an attachment or other process under which the body is taken and making a return thereon.

Service of any order of court not otherwise provided for, except that no fees shall be charged for protective orders issued pursuant to Chapter 11 (§ 16.1-226 et seq.) of Title 16.1.

Making a return of a writ of fieri facias where no levy is made or forthcoming bond is taken.

Summoning a witness in any case in which custody or visitation of a minor child or children is at issue.

The fees for process and service in the following instances shall be $25:

Service and publication of any notice of a publicly-advertised public sale.

Service of a writ of possession or writ of eviction, except that there shall be an additional fee of $12 for each additional defendant.

Levying upon current money, bank notes, goods or chattels of a judgment debtor pursuant to §

8.01-478

.

Service of a declaration in ejectment on any person, firm or corporation, except that there shall be an additional fee of $12 for each additional defendant.

Levying distress warrant or an attachment.

Levying an execution.

The process and service fee for serving any papers returnable out of state shall be $75, except no fees shall be charged for the service of papers in connection with the prosecution of any misdemeanor or felony domestic violence offense, or in connection with the filing, issuance, registration, or service of a protective order or a petition for a protective order. A victim of domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault shall not bear the costs associated with the filing of criminal charges against the offender, and no victim shall bear the costs associated with the filing, issuance, registration, or service of a warrant, protective order, petition for a protective order, or witness subpoena, issued inside or outside the Commonwealth.

The fees set out in this section shall be allowable for services provided by such officers in the circuit and district courts.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 14-104, 14-116, p. 25; 1964, c. 386, §§ 14.1-93, 14.1-105; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1972, c. 719; 1975, c. 591; 1976, cc. 308, 310; 1981, c. 411; 1982, c. 674; 1983, c. 407; 1984, c. 317; 1992, c. 648; 1995, c. 51, § 14.1-95.1; 1998, c. 872; 2002, c. 508; 2004, cc. 198, 211, 588; 2011, cc. 445, 480; 2019, cc. 180, 700.

Cross references.

As to fee for serving notice upon tenant of forfeiture of right to possession or termination of lease, see §

55.1-1247

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 508, in subsection B, added the language following “shall be fifty dollars” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 198 and 211 are identical, and substituted “$12” for “twelve dollars” in subsection A; substituted “an” for “a declaration in ejectment” in subdivision A 1; deleted subdivisions A 5 and A 6, pertaining to writ of possession and execution or distress warrant or an attachment; redesignated former subdivision A 7 as subdivision A 5; transferred subdivision A 8 to subdivision B 3; added subsection B; redesignated former subsections B and C as subsections C and D; and substituted “$75” for “fifty dollars” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2004 amendment by c. 588 added subdivision A 9 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 445 and 480 are identical, and in subsection C, in the first sentence, twice substituted “a protective order” for “a protection order” and deleted “to protect a victim of domestic violence, stalking or sexual assault” from the end, and in the last sentence, substituted “and no victim shall bear the costs” for “or the costs” and twice substituted “protective order” for “protection order.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 180 and 700 are identical, and inserted “or writ of eviction” in subdivision B 2.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Fees collected by sheriff when serving writs. —

The fees sheriffs may charge for service of Summons to Answer Interrogatories, Summons in Garnishment, and Writs of Fieri Facias are governed by the express terms of §

17.1-272

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L.J. Ayers, III, Sheriff for Amherst County, 10-075, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 3 (02/04/11).

§ 17.1-273.
Establishment and disposition of fees collected by certain high constable.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including a general or special act, the City of Norfolk, may, by duly adopted local ordinance, establish fees for the service of process by the office of the high constable. The office of the high constable in such city shall publish a schedule of such fees by January 1 of each year. Copies of the schedule shall be forwarded to the Clerk of the Supreme Court of Virginia. Only in the City of Norfolk, shall high constables execute all processes, warrants, summonses and notices in civil cases before the general district court of the city to the exclusion of the sheriff of the city. Any fees, collected by the office of the high constable for such process, shall be deposited in the treasury of the city wherein such office is situated for use in the general operation of city government.

History.

1998, c. 872; 2007, c. 813.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813, in the first sentence, substituted “the City of Norfolk” for “any city having a population in excess of 265,000 as reported in the U.S. Census of 1980 and having an office of the high constable” and “the office of the high constable” for “such office”; and substituted “the City of Norfolk” for “cities having a population in excess of 265,000 as reported in the U.S. Census of 1980” in the second sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Process, § 15; 16 M.J. Sheriffs, § 1.

§ 17.1-274.
Commission on forthcoming bond.

The commission to be included in a forthcoming bond, when one is taken, shall be five percent. Such commission shall not be received unless the bond is forfeited or paid, including the commission, to the plaintiffs. Of whatever interest accrues on such bond, or the execution of judgment thereon, the officer shall be entitled to his proportionable share, on account of his fees included in such bond.

In cities of a population of 100,000 and more, however, the commission to be included in a forthcoming bond, when one is taken, shall be ten percent on the first $100 of the money for which the distress or levy is and two percent on the residue. Such commission shall not be received unless the bond is forfeited or paid, including the commission, to the plaintiffs. Of whatever interest may accrue on such bonds, or the execution of judgment thereon, the officer shall be entitled to his proportionate share, on account of his fees included in the sale. An officer in any such city receiving payment in money or selling goods shall receive the like commission of ten percent on the first $100 of the money paid or proceeding from the sale and two percent on the residue; except that when such payment or sale is on an execution on a forthcoming bond, his commission shall only be half what it would be if the execution were not on such bond.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 14-119, 14-121; 1964, c. 386, §§ 14.1-108, 14.1-110; 1995, c. 51; 1998, c. 872.